District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1207.01

Cable Television special account.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 8, 29 DCR 2872
June 1, 1984, D.C. Law 5-85, § 2(d), 31 DCR 1864
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 2(g), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1807.1.
1981 Ed., § 43-1807.1.

Prior Codifications

For temporary amendment of section, see § 1512 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), § 1512 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669), and § 1512 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1512 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).

Emergency Legislation

Application of D.C. Law 12-175: Section 1914 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that § 1912 shall apply as of October 1, 1998.

Editor's Notes